public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
kòsa/D0I0‘0
an/T0‘0&0
vòlta/D0‘0
volta/D0‘0
par/B0I0’0
voxe/D0I0‘0&0
volto/B0‘0
tèrŧo/B0I0’0
tèrso/B0’0
kuarto/T0’0
koarto/B0’0
sèsto/B0I0’0
par/B0I0’0
nu/’0
vu/’0
ge/’0
sto/B0’0
indove/’0
kome/’0
kòsa/D0I0‘0&0<0<1§0
de/’0
so/’0
sora/E0E1E2’0=0
inté/‘0’0
intel/‘0U0
indrío/‘0
al/‘0
la/D0T4’0
an/T0‘0&0
na/’0
ankora/‘0
alora/‘0
aƚora/‘0
intanto/‘0
senŧa/’0
sensa/’0
vara/D0‘0
dito/B0I0‘0^0+0-0.0
volo/a0E0E1I0J0‘0*0.0
vòlo/a0E0E1I0J0‘0.0
voƚo/a0E0E2J0‘0*0.0
vòƚo/a0E0E2J0‘0.0
varar/a0a1a2E0E1E2‘0
varo/a0E0E1E2I0J0‘0
vàroe/a0a1a2K0‘0
vardar/a0a1a2E0E1E2‘0.0
vardo/a0E0E1E2I0J0‘0.0
vàrdoe/a0a1a2K0‘0.0
vòlto/a0E0E1E2I0J0‘0+0-0*0.0
voltar/a0a1a2E0E1E2‘0+0-0*0.0
vòlto/a0E0E1E2I0J0‘0+0-0*0.0
